Hawaii statutes.
[§432E-8] Enforcement. All remedies,
penalties, and proceedings in articles 2 and 13 of chapter 431 made applicable
hereby to managed care plans shall be invoked and enforced solely and
exclusively by the commissioner. [L 1998, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next